Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-278
Electronic communication system, defined.

Electronic communication system means any wire, radio, electromagnetic, photooptical, or photoelectronic facilities for the transmission of electronic communications and any computer facilities or related electronic equipment for the electronic storage of such communication.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 140.